Hawaii statutes.
[§329E-7] Opioid-related drug
overdose recognition, prevention, and response. The department of health
shall work with community partners to provide or establish any of the
following:

(1) Education on opioid-related drug overdose
prevention, recognition, and response, including opioid antagonist
administration;

(2) Training on opioid-related drug overdose
prevention, recognition, and response, including opioid antagonist
administration, for patients receiving opioids and their families and
caregivers;

(3) Opioid antagonist prescription and distribution
projects; and

(4) Education and training projects on opioid-related
drug overdose response and treatment, including opioid antagonist
administration, for emergency services and law enforcement personnel, including
volunteer firefighters, lifeguards, and emergency services personnel. [L 2016,
c 68, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next